Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.806

Exceptions to approved activity requirements. (Effective until November 1, 2024.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5752-S.SL) ***

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may not require an applicant or consumer to meet work requirements as a condition of receiving working connections child care benefits when the applicant or consumer is in a state registered apprenticeship program or is a full-time student of a community, technical, or tribal college and is enrolled in:

(i) A vocational education program that leads to a degree or certificate in a specific occupation; or

(ii) An associate degree program.

(b) An applicant or consumer is a full-time student for the purposes of this subsection if the applicant or consumer meets the college's definition of a full-time student.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may extend the provisions of this section to full-time students who are enrolled in a bachelor's degree program or applied baccalaureate degree program.

[ 2024 c 67 s 4.]

PDFRCW 43.216.806

Exceptions to approved activity requirements. (Effective November 1, 2024.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5752-S.SL) ***

(1)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may not require an applicant or consumer to meet work requirements as a condition of receiving working connections child care benefits when the applicant or consumer is in a state registered apprenticeship program or is a full-time student of a community, technical, or tribal college and is enrolled in:

(i) A vocational education program that leads to a degree or certificate in a specific occupation; or

(ii) An associate degree program.

(b) An applicant or consumer is a full-time student for the purposes of this subsection if the applicant or consumer meets the college's definition of a full-time student.

(c) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may extend the provisions of this subsection to full-time students who are enrolled in a bachelor's degree program or applied baccalaureate degree program.

(2) The department must consider an applicant or consumer's participation in the birth to three early childhood education and assistance program or the early head start program as an approved activity when determining eligibility for working connections child care benefits.

[ 2024 c 282 s 4; 2024 c 67 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 282: See note following RCW 43.216.812.